Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-866
Change in name; effect.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made by Laws 1993, LB 465, in the name of the Nebraska Educational Facilities Authority Act to the Nebraska Educational Finance Authority Act and in the name of the Nebraska Educational Facilities Authority to the Nebraska Educational Finance Authority shall not affect or alter any rights, privileges, or obligations existing immediately prior to September 9, 1993.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made by Laws 2013, LB170, in the name of the Nebraska Educational Finance Authority Act to the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act and in the name of the Nebraska Educational Finance Authority to the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority shall not affect or alter any rights, privileges, or obligations existing immediately prior to September 6, 2013.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the changes made by Laws 2019, LB224, in the name of the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority Act to the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act and in the name of the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance Authority to the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority shall not affect or alter any rights, privileges, or obligations existing immediately prior to September 1, 2019.

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 37;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2964;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 63;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1763;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 66;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 38.